Massachusetts, session 194th, H2855.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “office,”, in line 21, the following words:- for
services as executive director of the municipal police training committee pursuant to section 116
of chapter 6.
of 1